Maryland, session 2025, SB0108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–134.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS A CONDOMINIUM OR
A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(3) “CONDOMINIUM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0108*

SENATE BILL 108
(4) “COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(5) “MULTIFAMILY DWELLING” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL BUILDING
THAT IS PART OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY WITH MULTIPLE DWELLING
UNITS, A COMMON ENTRANCE, AND COMMON AREAS, INCLUDING HALLWAYS,
ELEVATORS, AND STAIRS.
(6) “RESIDENTIAL OWNER” MEANS:
(I) A UNIT OWNER OF A CONDOMINIUM; OR
(II) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(7) “SMOKE” OR “SMOKING” MEANS:
(I) THE INHALING, EXHALING, BURNING, OR CARRYING OF ANY
LIGHTED MATTER OR LIGHTED SUBSTANCE; OR
(II) THE USE OF A DEVICE TO DELIVER AEROSOLIZED OR
VAPORIZED VAPING LIQUID, AS DEFINED IN § 16.7–101 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE, TO AN INDIVIDUAL INHALING FROM THE DEVICE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO MULTIFAMILY DWELLINGS WITH FOUR OR
MORE DWELLING UNITS THAT ARE:
(1) USED FOR THE BENEFIT OF A RESIDENTIAL OWNER IN A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; OR
(2) RENTED BY THE RESIDENTIAL OWNER OF THE DWELLING UNIT TO
A TENANT UNDER A LEASE.
(C) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL
DEVELOP A SMOKING POLICY THAT IS AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE APPLICABLE
STATE AND LOCAL LAWS REGARDING SMOKING IF THE PROPERTY SUBJECT TO THE
CONTROL OF THE GOVERNING BODY IS A MULTIFAMILY DWELLING.
(D) A POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL STATE:
(1) THE LOCATIONS WHERE SMOKING IS AUTHORIZED ON THE
PROPERTY;
(2) THE LOCATIONS WHERE SMOKING IS PROHIBITED ON THE
PROPERTY;

SENATE BILL 108 3
(3) ANY CONDITIONS ON THE ABILITY TO SMOKE IN AREAS OF THE
PROPERTY WHERE SMOKING IS AUTHORIZED;
(4) THE PROCESS TO FILE A COMPLAINT AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO VIOLATES THE POLICY; AND
(5) ANY PENALTIES OR FINES FOR VIOLATING THE POLICY.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) LIMIT THE RIGHTS OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, TENANT, OR RESIDENTIAL OWNER TO INITIATE OR
DEFEND AGAINST A CIVIL ACTION; OR
(2) PREEMPT A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT FROM
ENACTING AND ENFORCING MEASURES REGARDING SMOKING POLICIES IN
MULTIFAMILY DWELLINGS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT THAN A POLICY ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.